Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.080

Majority vote required.

No county road shall be vacated and abandoned except by majority vote of the board properly entered, or by operation of law, or judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.87.080. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 51, part; RRS s 6450-51, part.]